California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
======================================================================
  Revenue and Taxation Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: September 26, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

GENERAL PROVISIONS

1.

This act shall be known as the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

The provisions of this code in so far as they are substantially the same as existing statutory provisions relating to the same subject matter shall be construed as restatements and continuations, and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

All persons who, at the time this code goes into effect, hold office under any of the acts repealed by this code, which offices are continued by this code, continue to hold them according to their former tenure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

Any action or proceeding commenced before this code takes effect, or any right accrued, is not affected by this code, but all procedure taken shall conform to the provisions of this code as far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions hereinafter set forth govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

Division, part, chapter, article, and section headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Whenever a power is granted to, or a duty imposed on, any person or board by any provision of this code, it may be exercised or performed by any deputy or person authorized by the person or board to whom the power is granted or on whom the duty is imposed, unless it is expressly provided that the power or duty shall be exercised or performed only by the person or board to whom the power is granted or on whom the duty is imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

Writing includes any form of recorded message capable of comprehension by ordinary visual means. Whenever any notice, report, petition, permit, statement, or record is required by this code, it shall be made in writing in the English language.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

Whenever any reference is made to any portion of this code or of any other law, the reference applies to all amendments and additions thereto now or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

“Section” means a section of this code unless some other statute is specifically mentioned and “subdivision” means a subdivision of the section in which that term occurs unless some other section is expressly mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses; and the future, the present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

The masculine gender includes the feminine and neuter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

12.2.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 94.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

The singular number includes the plural, and the plural the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

“City” includes incorporated city, city and county, municipal corporation, municipality, town, and incorporated town.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

“County” includes city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

“Oath” includes affirmation and written declarations signed under the penalties of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 323.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

“Signature” or “subscription” includes mark. Such mark shall be made as required in the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

“Person” includes any person, firm, partnership, general partner of a partnership, limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, foreign limited liability partnership, association, corporation, company, syndicate, estate, trust, business trust, or organization of any kind. As used in Division 2 (commencing with Section 6001), “person” shall include, in addition to the items of definition contained in the first sentence, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, receiver, executor, administrator, or assignee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 679, Sec. 10.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), and notwithstanding any other law, “board” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(b) Unless the context requires otherwise, as used in this code or any other code, “board,” with respect to an appeal, means the Office of Tax Appeals if the authority to handle appeals has been transferred from the State Board of Equalization to the Office of Tax Appeals pursuant to Part 9.5 (commencing with Section 15670) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Unless the context requires otherwise, as used in this code or any other code, “board” means the State Board of Equalization where the State Board
 of Equalization has retained authority pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 15600.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 16, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20.5.

(a) Unless the context requires otherwise, as used in this code or any other code, “board, itself” or “State Board of Equalization meeting as a public body” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for those duties, powers, and responsibilities transferred to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Section 15570.22 of the Government Code.

(b) Unless the context requires otherwise, as used in this code or any other code, “executive director” or “executive officer of the board” means the director of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for those duties, powers, and responsibilities transferred to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Section 15570.22 of
 the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 252, Sec. 16.   (AB 131)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

“Controller” means the State Controller.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

“Auditor” of a city or county means the chief accounting officer, by whatever title he may be known.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

23.

“Assessee” means the person to whom property or a tax is assessed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

24.

No act in all the proceedings for raising revenue by taxation is illegal on account of informality or because not completed within the required time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

25.

Unless expressly otherwise provided, any notice required to be given to any person by any provision of this code may be given in the manner prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure for service by mail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

26.

If any provision of this code, or its application to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the code, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances, is not affected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

27.

This code, and any amendment hereto made by any statute enacted at the fifty-third session of the Legislature, takes effect on February 1, 1941.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

28.5.

As used in Division 1 of this code, “partnership” shall include limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, and foreign limited liability partnership, except where the context or the specific provisions of this division otherwise require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 679, Sec. 11.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

29.

Whenever any official is authorized to commence an action for the violation of any law relating to revenue or to compel the specific performance of such a law, he may designate the county in which the action shall be commenced and prosecuted, unless otherwise provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

30.

The courts of this State shall recognize and enforce liabilities for taxes lawfully imposed by any other state, or the political subdivisions thereof, which extends a like comity to this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------

31.

The Attorney General or an appropriate official of any political subdivision of this State may bring suits in the courts of other states to collect taxes legally due this State or any political subdivision thereof. The officials of other states which extend a like comity to this State are empowered to sue for the collection of such taxes in the courts of this State. A certificate by the Secretary of State under the Great Seal of the State that such officers have authority to collect the tax is conclusive evidence of such authority. This section does not apply to Parts 8 and 9 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

33.

Human whole blood, plasma, blood products, and blood derivatives, or any human body parts held in a bank for medical purposes, shall be exempt from taxation for any purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

34.

Whenever an amount of money paid by a person to the state or any of its agencies includes a sum which can be identified as in fact intended as payment of a locally administered tax which should have been paid directly to a city, city and county, county or district within the state, the state or its agency may pay the amount to the local government entitled thereto and notify the payor of its action. This procedure, however, shall not be followed by the state or any of its agencies unless the governing body of the local government concerned has, by resolution, agreed with respect to such payments that a timely payment received by the state or its agency will be regarded as a timely payment to the local government concerned, and that it will process all claims with respect to such payment in the same manner as though the payment had been made to it in the first instance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35.

Commencing with its January 1, 1985, population base and continuing until the date of certification of the 1990 Federal Census, the population to be used by the Controller and by all other state and county agencies for all purposes of allocation and distribution of grant funds and subventions, including, without limitation, the annual allocation from the Public Library Fund and from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, for any general law city located in a county of the 11th class, which city’s population as of January 1, 1985, was 38,925 based upon an estimate validated by the Department of Finance, shall be 38,925, adjusted annually, commencing January 1, 1986, by the percentage of population growth of the State of California as a whole.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

36.

Whenever any notice or other communication is required by this code to be mailed by registered mail, the mailing of such notice or other communication by certified mail shall be deemed to be sufficient compliance with the requirements of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 287.)
-------------------------------------------

36.5.

(a) Whenever this code requires the tax collector to publish a notice in a newspaper, the tax collector shall also provide notice on the tax collector’s regularly maintained Internet Web site.

(b) Any notice provided on the tax collector’s Internet Web site pursuant to this section shall be available for at least
 the same amount of time as the notice is required to be published in a newspaper.

(c) The notice required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be provided using either of the following methods:

(1) By posting a copy of the newspaper containing the notice in a format that is downloaded in PDF format.

(2) By providing a link to the Internet Web site of the newspaper containing the notice.

(d) For purposes of this section, “newspaper” means a newspaper of
 general circulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 653)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

37.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all interest and penalties owing due to late payment of supplemental unsecured property tax levies shall be canceled, if such payment is made by December 31, 1981.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all interest and penalties owing on the readjusted amount of any other tax resulting from supplemental unsecured property tax levies shall be canceled, if the payment of such readjusted tax is made by December 31, 1981.

As used in this section, “supplemental unsecured property tax levies” shall mean that amount of property tax levied by any city, county, city and county, and special district which is attributable to that portion of the property tax rate levied on the unsecured roll for the 1978–79 tax year, less the rate for voter-approved indebtedness, which is in excess of four dollars ($4) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value.

As used in this section, “the readjusted amount of any other tax resulting from supplemental unsecured property tax levies” shall mean the difference in any other tax levy between the amount that would have been levied had Article XIIIA applied to the 1978–79 unsecured property tax roll and the amount levied using the 1977–78 secured roll property tax rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 242, Sec. 3.   Effective July 21, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

38.

(a) The Legislative Analyst shall submit a report to the Legislature regarding the possible consolidation of the remittance processing and cashiering functions and the mail processing operations, of the Franchise Tax Board, the State Board of Equalization, and the Employment Development Department.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board, the State Board of Equalization, and the Employment Development Department shall provide the Legislative Analyst all data and information that the Legislative Analyst identifies as necessary for completing the report and shall assist the Legislative Analyst in the preparation of the report. The information provided to the Legislative Analyst shall include, but not be limited to, an evaluation of the short- and long-term fiscal and budgetary advantages and disadvantages that would result from the proposed consolidation of the remittance processing and cashiering functions and the mail processing functions of, the Franchise Tax Board, the State Board of Equalization, and the Employment Development Department. Any data and information requested by the Legislative Analyst shall be submitted on or before July 1, 2004.

(c) The purpose of the report required by this section is to determine, to the extent possible and based on available information and reasonable assumptions, if there are any benefits to the consolidation of the management and control of these operations based on all of the following criteria:

(1) The elimination of duplicative functions and fragmented responsibilities.

(2) Increased operational efficiencies due to the use of improved technologies and economies of scale.

(3) Additional interest earnings for the state.

(d) For purposes of this section, “remittance processing and cashiering” means receiving, batching, balancing, and depositing remittances.

(e) The Legislative Analyst shall provide to the Legislature its report and any recommendations and considerations with regard to the possible consolidation of these functions by November 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 569, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

38.7.

(a) On or before January 1, 2016, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall provide to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, and the public a report evaluating the economic effects and administration of the tax credits allowed pursuant to Sections 6902.5, 17053.85, and 23685. In researching the reports, the Legislative Analyst’s Office may do all of the following:

(1) Request and receive all information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g) of Sections 17053.85 and 23685.

(2) Request and receive all information provided to the Franchise Tax Board relating
 to the sale or assignment of credits pursuant to subdivision (c) of Sections 17053.85 and 23685.

(3) Request and receive all information provided to the board pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (g) of Section 6902.5.

(b) The California Film Commission, the board, the Franchise Tax Board, the Employment Development Department, and all other relevant state agencies shall provide additional information, as specified by the Legislative Analyst’s Office, as needed to research the reports required by this section.

(c) (1) The information received by the Legislative Analyst’s Office pursuant to this section shall be considered confidential taxpayer information subject to Sections 7056, 7056.5, and 19542 of this code and Section 1094 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, and shall be subject to the
 appropriate confidentiality requirements of the participating state agency.

(2) The Legislative Analyst’s Office may publish statistics in conjunction with the reports required by this section that are derived from information provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office pursuant to this section if the published statistics are classified to prevent the identification of particular taxpayers, reports, and tax returns and the publication of the percentage of dividends paid by a corporation that is deductible by the recipient under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 840, Sec. 1.   (SB 1197)   Effective September 30, 2012.   See similar section added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 841.)
-------------------------------------------

38.7.

(a) On or before January 1, 2016, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall provide to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, and the public a report evaluating the economic effects and administration of the tax credits allowed pursuant to Sections 6902.5, 17053.85, and 23685. In researching the reports, the Legislative Analyst’s Office may do all of the following:

(1) Request and receive all information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g) of Sections 17053.85 and 23685.

(2) Request and receive all information provided to the Franchise
 Tax Board relating to the sale or assignment of credits
 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Sections 17053.85 and 23685.

(3) Request and receive all information provided to the board pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (g) of Section 6902.5.

(b) The California Film Commission, the board, the Franchise Tax Board, the Employment Development Department, and all other relevant state agencies shall provide additional information, as specified by the Legislative Analyst’s Office, as needed to research the reports required by this section.

(c) (1) The information received by the Legislative Analyst’s Office pursuant to this section shall be considered confidential taxpayer information subject to Sections 7056, 7056.5, and 19542 of this code and Section 1094 of
 the Unemployment Insurance Code, and shall be subject to the appropriate confidentiality requirements of the participating state agency.

(2) The Legislative Analyst’s Office may publish statistics in conjunction with the reports required by this section that are derived from information provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office pursuant to this section if the published statistics are classified to prevent the identification of particular taxpayers, reports, and tax returns and the publication of the percentage of dividends paid by a corporation that is deductible by the recipient under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 841, Sec. 1.   (AB 2026)   Effective September 30, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

38.9.

(a) On or before May 1, 2023, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall provide to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, and the public a report evaluating the economic effects and administration of the tax credits allowed pursuant to Sections 6902.5, as amended by Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2020, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23695, and 23698. In researching the reports, the Legislative Analyst’s Office may do all of the following:

(1) Request and receive all information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g) of Sections 17053.95, 17053.98, 23695, and 23698.

(2) Request and receive all information provided to the Franchise Tax Board relating to the sale or assignment of credits pursuant to subdivision (c) of Sections 17053.95, 17053.98, 23695, and 23698.

(3) Request and receive all information provided to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (g) of Section 6902.5, as amended by Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2020.

(b) On or before May 1, 2025, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall provide to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, and the public a report that summarizes the workforce diversity information collected by the California Film Commission pursuant to Sections 17053.95, 17053.98, 23695, and 23698 and that evaluates the effectiveness of the tax credits allowed pursuant to Sections 17053.98 and 23698, calculated using any applicable additional credit percentages, for increasing the diversity of the film production workforce. In researching the report, the Legislative Analyst’s Office may request and receive all information provided to the
 California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g) of Sections 17053.95, 17053.98, 23695, and 23698.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 19542, the California Film Commission, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, the Franchise Tax Board, the Employment Development Department, and all other relevant state agencies shall provide additional information, as specified by the Legislative Analyst’s Office, as needed to research the reports required by this section.

(d) (1) The information received by the Legislative Analyst’s Office pursuant to this section shall be considered confidential taxpayer information subject to Sections 7056, 7056.5, and 19542 of this code and Section 1094 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, and shall be subject to the appropriate confidentiality requirements of the participating state agency.

(2) The Legislative Analyst’s Office may publish statistics in conjunction with the reports required by this section that are derived from information provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office pursuant to this section, if the published statistics are
 classified to prevent the identification of particular taxpayers, reports, and tax returns and the publication of the percentage of dividends paid by a corporation that is deductible by the recipient under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   (SB 144)   Effective July 21, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

38.10.

(a) The Legislative Analyst shall, on an annual basis beginning January 1, 2021, collaborate with the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the Office of Historic Preservation to review the effectiveness of the tax credits allowed by Sections 17053.91 and 23691. The review shall include, but is not limited to, an analysis of the demand for the tax credit, the types and uses of projects receiving the tax credit, the jobs created by the use of the tax credits, and the economic impact of the tax credits.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.   (AB 150)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40.

(a) (1) The board shall publish on its Internet Web site a written formal opinion, a written memorandum opinion, or a written summary decision for each decision of the board in which the amount in controversy is five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more, within 120 days of the date upon which the board rendered its decision.

(2) A decision of the board shall not include consent calendar actions taken by the board.

(b) Each formal opinion, memorandum opinion, and summary decision as described in subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) Findings of fact.

(2) The legal issue or issues presented.

(3) Applicable law.

(4) Analysis.

(5) Disposition.

(6) Names of adopting board members.

(c) (1) A board member may submit a dissenting opinion setting forth his or her rationale for disagreeing with the memorandum opinion or formal opinion.

 (2) A board member may submit a concurring opinion setting forth the board member’s rationale for agreeing with the result reached in the memorandum opinion or formal opinion, if different than the rationale set forth in the
 memorandum opinion or formal opinion. 

(3) A dissenting opinion and a concurring opinion shall be published in the same manner as prescribed in subdivision (a) for a formal opinion or memorandum opinion.

 (d) A formal opinion or memorandum opinion adopted by the board may be cited as precedent in any matter or proceeding before the board, unless the opinion has been depublished, overruled, or superseded. A summary decision may not be cited as precedent in any matter or proceeding before the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.   (AB 2323)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

41.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in paragraph (2), any bill, introduced on or after January 1, 2020, that would authorize a new tax expenditure under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2, Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2, or both, or that would authorize an exemption from the taxes imposed by Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2, shall contain all of the following:

(A) Specific goals, purposes, and objectives that the tax expenditure will achieve.

(B) Detailed performance indicators for the Legislature to use when measuring whether the tax expenditure meets the goals, purposes, and objectives stated in the bill.

(C) Data collection requirements to enable the Legislature to determine whether the tax expenditure is meeting, failing to meet, or exceeding those specific goals, purposes, and objectives. The requirements shall include the specific data and baseline measurements to be collected and remitted in each year the tax expenditure is in effect, in order for the Legislature to measure the change in performance indicators, and the specific taxpayers, state agencies, or other entities required to collect and remit data.

(2) A bill that would authorize a new tax expenditure that is a gross income exclusion shall be exempt from including the information in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1), if the Legislature determines there is no available data to collect and report.

(b) For purposes of this section, “tax expenditure” means a credit, deduction, exclusion, exemption, or any other tax benefit as provided for by the state.

(c) Taxpayer information collected pursuant to this section is subject to Sections 7056.5 and 19542.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 124, Sec. 1.   (AB 3289)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. PROPERTY TAXATION [50. - 5911.]



PART 0.5. IMPLEMENTATION OF ARTICLE XIII A OF THE CALIFORNIA CONSTITUTION [50. - 100.96.]



  CHAPTER 1. Base Year Values [50. - 53.]

50.

For purposes of base year values as determined by Section 110.1, values determined for property which is purchased or changes ownership after the 1975 lien date shall be entered on the roll for the lien date next succeeding the date of the purchase or change in ownership. Values determined after the 1975 lien date for property which is newly constructed shall be entered on the roll for the lien date next succeeding the date of completion of the new construction. The value of new construction in progress on the lien date shall be entered on the roll as of the lien date.
 However, the value of new construction in progress shall not be a base year value until completion of that construction, as described in Section 71.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 80, Sec. 1.   (AB 652)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

51.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, for each lien date after the lien date in which the base year value is determined pursuant to Section 110.1, the taxable value of real property shall, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) or (c), be the lesser of:

(1) Its base year value, compounded annually since the base year by an inflation factor, which shall be determined as follows:

(A) For any assessment year commencing prior to January 1, 1985, the inflation factor shall be the percentage change in the cost of living, as defined in Section 2212.

(B) For any assessment year commencing after January 1, 1985, and prior to January 1, 1998, the inflation factor shall be the percentage change, rounded to the nearest one-thousandth of 1 percent, from December of the prior fiscal year to December of the current fiscal year in the California Consumer Price Index for all items, as determined by the California Department of Industrial Relations.

(C) For any assessment year commencing on or after January 1, 1998, the inflation factor shall be the percentage change, rounded to the nearest one-thousandth of 1 percent, from October of the prior fiscal year to October of the current fiscal year in the California Consumer Price Index for all items, as determined by the California Department of Industrial Relations.

(D) In no event shall the percentage increase for any assessment year determined pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) exceed 2 percent of the prior year’s value.

(2) Its full cash value, as defined in Section 110, as of the lien date, taking into account reductions in value due to damage, destruction, depreciation, obsolescence, removal of property, or other factors causing a decline in value.

(b) If the real property was damaged or destroyed by disaster, misfortune, or calamity and the board of supervisors of the county in which the real property is located has not adopted an ordinance pursuant to Section 170, or any portion of the real property has been removed by voluntary action by the taxpayer, the taxable value of the property shall be the sum of the following:

(1) The lesser of its base year value of land determined under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or full cash value of land determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) The lesser of its base year value of improvements determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or the full cash value of improvements determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

In applying this subdivision, the base year value of the subject real property does not include that portion of the previous base year value of that property that was attributable to any portion of the property that has been destroyed or removed. The sum determined under this subdivision shall then become the base year value of the real property until that property is restored, repaired, or reconstructed or other provisions of law require establishment of a new base year value.

(c) If the real property was damaged or destroyed by disaster, misfortune or calamity and the board of supervisors in the county in which the real property is located has adopted an ordinance pursuant to Section 170, the taxable value of the real property shall be its assessed value as computed pursuant to Section 170.

(d) For purposes of this section, “real property” means that appraisal unit that persons in the marketplace commonly buy and sell as a unit, or that is normally valued separately.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the assessor to make an annual reappraisal of all assessable property. However, for each lien date after the first lien date for which the taxable value of property is reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the value of that property shall be annually reappraised at its full cash value as defined in Section 110 until that value exceeds the value determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). In no event shall the assessor condition the implementation of the preceding sentence in any year upon the filing of an assessment appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

51.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, any error or omission in the determination of a base year value pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 110.1, including the failure to establish that base year value, which does not involve the exercise of an assessor’s judgment as to value, shall be corrected in any assessment year in which the error or omission is discovered.

(b) An error or an omission described in subdivision (a) which involves the exercise of an assessor’s judgment as to value may be corrected only if it is placed on the current roll or roll being prepared, or is otherwise corrected, within four years after July 1 of the assessment year for which the base year value was first established.

(c) An error or an omission involving the exercise of an assessor’s judgment as to value shall not include errors or omissions resulting from the taxpayer’s fraud, concealment, misrepresentation, or failure to comply with any provision of law for furnishing information required by Sections 441, 470, 480, 480.1, and 480.2, or from clerical errors.

(d) If a correction authorized by subdivision (a) or (b) reduces the base year value, appropriate cancellations or refunds of tax shall be granted in accordance with this division. If the correction increases the base year value, appropriate escape assessments shall be imposed in accordance with this division.

(e) The existence of a clerical error shall be proved by a preponderance of the evidence, except that if the correction is made more than four years after July 1 of the assessment year for which the base year value was first established the clerical error shall be proved by clear and convincing evidence, including the papers in the assessor’s office. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to change the standard of proof applicable to a determination of the value of property.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Assessment year” means an assessment year as defined in Section 118.

(2) “Clerical errors” means only those defects of a mechanical, mathematical, or clerical nature, not involving judgment as to value, where it can be shown from papers in the assessor’s office or other evidence that the defect resulted in a base year value that was not intended by the assessor at the time it was determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 126, Sec. 2.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

52.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, property which is enforceably restricted pursuant to Section 8 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall be valued for property tax purposes pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 421) and Article 1.9 (commencing with Section 439) of Chapter 3 of Part 2.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, property restricted to timberland use pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall be valued for property tax purposes pursuant to Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 431) of Chapter 3 of Part 2.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, property subject to valuation as a golf course pursuant to Section 10 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall be valued for property tax purposes in accordance with such section.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this division, property subject to valuation pursuant to Section 11 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall be valued for property tax purposes in accordance with such section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

53.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the initial base year value for fruit and nut trees and grapevines subject to exemption pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall be the full cash value of those properties as of the lien date of their first taxable year.
